Maryland, session 2026, HB1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–501.
(a) (1) The Department may implement a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program in accordance with the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program shall include:
(i) a Restaurant Meals Program in accordance with § 5–505 of this
subtitle; and
(ii) a Heat and Eat Program in accordance with § 5–506 of this
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1318*

HOUSE BILL 1318
subtitle.
(b) The State shall bear the nonfederal portion of the administrative costs of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for each county.
(c) Each local department shall administer the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program:
(1) under the supervision and control of the Department; and
(2) in accordance with the regulations of the Department and federal law.
(d) If a household includes an individual who is at least 60 years old and receives
a federally funded benefit in an amount less than $50 per month under the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program, the State shall provide a supplement to increase the total
benefit to $50 per month.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE PROCESS TO:
(I) SYSTEMATICALLY ANALYZE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATIVE ERRORS;
(II) FORMULATE STRATEGIES, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS IN
THE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION PROCESS, TO REDUCE ADMINISTRATIVE ERRORS;
AND
(III) MONITOR IMPLEMENTATION OF THE STRATEGIES
DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(2) WORK TOWARD ACHIEVING ERROR RATES EQUAL TO THE LEVEL
ACHIEVED BY THE BEST PERFORMING STATE IN THE UNITED STATES, AS
DETERMINED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.